Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4705
Jailhouse informant receiving leniency; notice to victim.

(1) For purposes of this section, the terms plea agreement and victim have the same meanings as in section 81-1848.

(2) If a jailhouse informant receives leniency related to a pending charge, a conviction, or a sentence for a crime against a victim, in connection with offering or providing testimony against a suspect or defendant, the prosecutor shall notify such victim.

(3) Prior to reaching a plea agreement, the prosecutor shall proceed as provided in subsection (2) of section 23-1201. For purposes of this section, leniency means any plea bargain, reduced or dismissed charges, bail consideration, or reduction or modification of sentence.

Laws 2019, LB352, § 5;

Laws 2026, LB1181, § 4.
July 18, 2026